Utah statutes.
31A-27a-702.   Health maintenance organization claims.

(1)  In the liquidation of a health maintenance organization, a claim for uncovered expenditures has priority over a Class 3 claim as provided for in Section 31A-27a-701.

(2)  A claim other than one described in Subsection (1) shall follow the priority of distribution outlined in Section 31A-27a-701.

